District of Columbia statutes.
31-3931.21

Regulations.

The Commissioner may issue rules and regulations relating to captive insurers as are necessary to enable him or her to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 22, 52 DCR 1205

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3931.06, § 31-3931.22, and § 31-3932.03.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 22 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).